pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes equestres > Equipamento para montaria > Acessórios para selas: Alforjes; Produtos de limpeza e hidratação para sela; Bolsas e capas para selas; Ferragens e peças de reposição para sela; Mantas protetoras para selas; Suporte para selas; Capas e protetores de assento de sela; Látegos e contra-látegos de sela; Acessórios utilitários de sela
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Binicilik > At Eyer Takımı Aksesuarları > Eyer Aksesuarları: Eyer Çantaları ve Bagaj Çantaları; Eyer temizleyicileri ve bakım ürünleri; Eyer Örtüleri ve Kılıfları; Eyer donanımı ve yedek parçaları; Eyer Pedleri; Eyer Askıları; Eyer oturma yeri koruyucuları; Eyer kayışları ve bağlama kayışları; Eyer yardımcı aksesuarları
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 乗馬 > 馬具関連用品 > 鞍関連用品: サドルバッグ・パニエ; 鞍用クリーナー・コンディショナー; 鞍カバー/ケース; 鞍用ハードウェア・交換パーツ; サドルパッド; サドルスタンド; サドルシートセイバー; サドルストラップ・タイストラップ; 鞍用ユーティリティアクセサリー
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การขี่ม้า > อุปกรณ์ขี่ม้า > อุปกรณ์อานม้า: กระเป๋าจักรยาน; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดและบำรุงรักษาอานม้า; กระเป๋าและที่คลุมสำหรับอานม้า; ฮาร์ดแวร์และชิ้นส่วนอะไหล่อานม้า; แผ่นรองและผ้าคลุมอานม้า; ชั้นวางอานม้า; แผ่นหุ้มเบาะอานม้า; สายรัดอานและสายผูกอานม้า; อุปกรณ์เสริมอเนกประสงค์สำหรับอานม้า
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 马术用品 > 马具配件 > 马鞍配件: 马鞍包/驮包; 马鞍清洁剂和护理剂; 马鞍罩/套; 马鞍五金件和替换零件; 马鞍垫; 马鞍架; 马鞍座垫; 马鞍带和系带; 马鞍实用配件
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Jazdectvo > Príslušenstvo pre jazdecké potreby > Príslušenstvo pre sedlá: Sedlové tašky a brašne; Prostriedky na čistenie a ošetrovanie sediel; Poťahy a puzdrá na sedlá; Materiál a náhradné diely na sedlá; Sedlové podložky a deky; Stojany na sedlá; Sedlové chrániče; Popruhy na sedlo a popruhy na upevnenie sedla; Príslušenstvo k sedlu
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Equitación > Accesorios para riendas de caballos > Accesorios para sillas de montar: Bolsas y alforjas para sillas de montar; Limpiadores y acondicionadores para silla de montar; Cubiertas y fundas para sillines; Herrajes y piezas de repuesto para silla de montar; Almohadillas y mantillas para sillas de montar; Soportes para sillas de montar; Fundas protectoras para asiento de silla de montar; Correas de silla y latigos; Accesorios utilitarios para silla de montar
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Jezdectví > Příslušenství pro koně > Příslušenství k sedlům: Sedlové brašny a vaky; Prostředky na čištění a údržbu sedel; Obaly a brašny na sedla; Kování a náhradní díly k sedlům; Podložky a deky pod sedla; Stojany na sedla; Potahy na posedlí; Sedlové a upínací řemeny; Užitkové příslušenství k sedlům
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 馬術運動 > 馬具配件 > 馬鞍配件: 馬鞍袋; 馬鞍清潔與保養劑; 馬鞍套; 馬鞍五金與替換零件; 鞍墊; 馬鞍架; 馬鞍墊套; 馬鞍綁帶與繫帶; 馬鞍實用配件
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Hästsport > Tillbehör till hästutrustning > Sadeltillbehör: Sadelväskor och packväskor; Sadelrengöring och lädervård; Ridsadelskydd; Sadelbeslag och reservdelar; Sadeldynor; Sadelställ; Sätesskydd för sadlar; Sadelremmar och fästremmar; Funktionella sadeltillbehör
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Конный спорт > Аксессуары для сбруи > Аксессуары для седел: Седельные сумки; Очистители и кондиционеры для седел; Чехлы на седла; Фурнитура и запчасти для седел; Вальтрапы и потники под седла; Стойки и подставки для седел; Чехлы на сиденье седла; Приструги и соединительные ремни; Вспомогательные аксессуары для седел
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Jojimo sportas > Žirgų įrangos priedai > Balnų priedai: Balnakrepšiai; Balno valikliai ir kondicionieriai; Balnų užtiesalai ir dėklai; Balno furnitūra ir atsarginės dalys; Pobalniai ir antklodės; Balnų stelažai; Balno sėdynės paminkštinimai; Balno dirželiai ir tvirtinimo diržai; Balno universalūs priedai
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Reitsportzubehör > Zubehör für Sattel & Zaumzeug > Sattelzubehör: Satteltaschen; Sattelreiniger & Pflegemittel; Sattelbezüge und -hüllen; Beschläge & Ersatzteile für Sättel; Sattelpolster & -decken; Sattelauflagen; Sattelschoner; Sattelriemen & Tie-Straps; Praktisches Sattelzubehör
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Paardensport > Accessoires voor paardentuig > Zadelaccessoires: Zadeltassen en bagagerollen; Zadelreinigers en conditioners; Zadelhoezen en -koffers; Zadelhardware en vervangende onderdelen; Zadelkussens en -dekens; Zadelrekken; Zadelzitbeschermers; Zadelriemen en tie straps; Praktische zadelaccessoires
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 승마 > 마구 부대용품 > 안장 부대용품: 안장 가방/바구니; 안장 클리너 및 컨디셔너; 안장 커버/케이스; 안장 하드웨어 및 교체 부품; 안장 패드/담요; 안장 걸이; 안장 시트 세이버; 안장 스트랩 및 타이 스트랩; 안장 유틸리티 액세서리
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Equitazione > Accessori per finimenti per cavalli > Accessori per selle: Borse e ceste per selle; Detergenti e balsami per selle; Coperture e custodie per selle; Minuteria e componenti di ricambio per selle; Sottosella; Portasella; Copriseggio per selle; Cinghie e riscontri per selle; Accessori funzionali per selle
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Echitație > Accesorii harnașamente pentru cai > Accesorii șei: Genți de șa și genți de transport; Produse de curățare și condiționare a șeii; Huse și cutii pentru șei; Componente și piese de schimb pentru șa; Inserții și pături pentru șei; Suporturi pentru șei; Protecții pentru șa; Curele și bretele de șa; Accesorii utilitare pentru șa
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Hestesport > Tilbehør til hesteutstyr > Saltilbehør: Salvesker; Salsåpe og lærbalsam; Saltrekk og -vesker; Beslag og reservedeler til sal; Salputer og -tepper; Salstativer; Setebeskyttere til sal; Salstropper og festestropper; Praktisk tilbehør til sal
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Конен спорт > Аксесоари за конски сбруи > Аксесоари за седла: Чанти и дисаги за седло; Почистващи препарати и омекотители за седла; Калъфи и покривала за седла; Обков за седло и резервни части; Подложки за седла и одеяла; Стойки за седла; Защитни средства за седалки; Каишки за седла и каишки за връзване; Аксесоари за седла
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Dressur > Tilbehør til rideudstyr > Sadeltilbehør: Saddeltasker og -kurve; Rengørings- og plejeprodukter til sadler; Sadelovertræk og -kasser; Beslag og reservedele til sadler; Pads til sadler; Sadelstativer; Sædeovertræk til sadler; Sadelstropper og remme; Praktisk tilbehør til sadler
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Équitation > Accessoires de harnachement pour chevaux > Accessoires de selles: Sacs et sacoches de selles; Nettoyants et baumes pour selle; Étuis et housses pour selles; Quincaillerie et pièces de rechange pour selle; Tapis de selles; Porte-selles; Dessus de selle; Courroies et sanglons de selle; Accessoires utilitaires pour selle
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Equestre > Acessórios de equipamento para cavalos > Acessórios para selas: Bolsas e sacos para selas; Produtos de limpeza e condicionadores para sela; Estojos e proteções de sela; Ferragens e peças de substituição para sela; Cobertores e proteções para selas; Suportes para selas; Capas de proteção para assento de sela; Correias de fixação para sela; Acessórios utilitários para sela
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Jahanje > Dodatki za konjsko opremo > Dodatki za sedla: Torbe in prtljažniki za sedla; Čistila in balzami za sedla; Prevleke in kovčki za sedla; Sedlarska okovja in nadomestni deli; Blazine in odeje za sedla; Nosilci za sedla; Podloge za sedlo; Sedlni jermeni in pritrdilni trakovi; Dodatki za sedlo
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cưỡi ngựa > Phụ kiện bộ yên cương ngựa > Phụ kiện yên ngựa: Túi yên ngựa và giỏ vắt hai bên lưng ngựa; Dung dịch làm sạch & bảo dưỡng yên ngựa; Vải bọc và hộp đựng yên ngựa; Phụ tùng & phụ kiện yên ngựa; Đệm và khăn lót yên ngựa; Giá treo yên ngựa; Tấm bọc bảo vệ yên ngựa; Dây nịt & đai nịt yên ngựa; Phụ kiện đa năng cho yên ngựa
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Jahanje > Pribor za opremu za konje > Pribor za sedlo: Torbe i kovčezi za sedlo; Sredstva za čišćenje i regeneraciju sedla; Navlake i spremnici za sedla; Oprema i rezervni dijelovi za sedlo; Pokrivači i deke za sedla; Stalci za sedla; Zaštite za sedlo; Remeni za sedlo i vezice; Višenamjenski dodaci za sedlo
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Lovaglás > Lófelszerelés-kiegészítők > Nyeregkiegészítők: Nyeregtáskák és -oldaltáskák; Nyeregtisztítók és -ápolók; Nyereghuzatok és -tokok; Nyereg vasalatok és cserealkatrészek; Nyeregbetétek és -takarók; Nyeregtartók; Nyeregülés-védők; Nyeregszíjak és rögzítőszíjak; Nyeregkiegészítők
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ratsastus > Hevosen lisätarvikkeet > Satulatarvikkeet: Satulalaukut ja sivulaukut; Satulan puhdistus- ja hoitoaineet; Satulapeiteet ja -kotelot; Satulan metalliosat ja varaosat; Satulahuovat ja voilokit; Satulatelineet; Satulanistuinpäälliset; Satulan hihnat ja vastinhihnat; Satulan lisätarvikkeet
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Jeździectwo > Akcesoria do uprzęży jeździeckich > Osprzęt do siodeł: Torby i sakwy do siodeł; Środki do czyszczenia i pielęgnacji siodeł; Pokrowce i futerały na siodła; Okucia i części zamienne do siodeł; Podkładki pod siodło; Stojaki na siodła; Pokrowce na siedzisko siodła; Przystuły i rzemienie westernowe; Akcesoria użytkowe do siodeł
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Equestrian > Horse Tack Accessories > Saddle Accessories: Saddle Bags & Panniers; Saddle Cleaners & Conditioners; Saddle Covers & Cases; Saddle Hardware & Replacement Parts; Saddle Pads & Blankets; Saddle Racks; Saddle Seat Savers; Saddle Straps & Tie Straps; Saddle Utility Accessories
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ιππασία > Αξεσουάρ εξοπλισμού αλόγου > Αξεσουάρ σέλας: Σάκοι & σακίδια σέλας; Καθαριστικά & μαλακτικά σέλας; Καλύμματα & θήκες σέλας; Μεταλλικά στοιχεία & ανταλλακτικά σέλας; Επιθέματα & κουβέρτες σέλας; Σχάρες σέλας; Προστατευτικά καλύμματα καθίσματος σέλας; Λουριά & ιμάντες σέλας; Χρηστικά αξεσουάρ σέλας